Utah statutes.
76-8-408.   Giving false tax receipt or failing to give receipt.
Every person who uses or gives any receipt, except that prescribed by law, as
evidence of the payment for any tax or license of any kind, or who receives
payment for the tax or license without delivering the receipt prescribed by
law, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
